Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-504.01
Conditions of eligibility; partially or totally unemployed parent or needy caretaker.

As a condition of eligibility for aid for children included in section 43-504, a partially or totally unemployed parent or needy caretaker shall participate in the employment preparation or training program for aid to dependent children, unless considered exempt under rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Department of Health and Human Services, and any totally or partially unemployed parent or needy caretaker who fails or refuses without good cause to participate in the employment preparation or training program or who refuses without good cause to accept employment in which he or she is able to engage which will increase his or her ability to maintain himself or herself and his or her family shall be deemed by such refusal to have rendered his or her children ineligible for further aid until he or she has complied with this section.

The requirements of this section shall also apply to any dependent child unless he or she is under age sixteen or attending, full time, an elementary, secondary, or vocational school.

Laws 1965, c. 242, § 2, p. 692;

Laws 1981, Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 152;

Laws 1997, LB 864, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 111.